Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.270

Assistant ratios—Data collection.

Recognizing the trend in utilization of speech-language pathologist assistants and audiologist assistants across practice settings, the board of hearing and speech shall, on an ongoing basis, collect data on: The number of assistants in specific practice settings; supervisor to speech-language pathologist assistant or audiologist assistant ratios; and the level of education and training of speech-language pathologist assistants and audiologist assistants.

[ 1996 c 200 s 35.]